Hawaii statutes.
§412:8-201 Fiduciary powers. Every
trust company shall have the power and authority to serve as a trustee,
personal representative, conservator, assignee for the benefit of others, or
receiver, subject to the duties imposed by the instrument or by law. As used
herein, the term "instrument" means any trust agreement, declaration,
or other agreement, any valid will, or any court order or decree in any
probate, guardianship, conservatorship, or receivership. Pursuant thereto, a
trust company is authorized and empowered to exercise powers as provided by
law, including but not limited to:

(1) Perform such acts as may be prudent, consistent
with, and reasonably necessary to carry out the legitimate purposes of the
instrument;

(2) Administer, fulfill, and discharge all lawful
duties imposed by the instrument or by law, for such remuneration as may be
agreed upon or provided by law;

(3) Acquire principal and income on behalf of the
estate administered by the trust company, including without limitation real property,
insurance proceeds, rents, interest, dividends, mortgages, bonds, bills, notes,
and securities;

(4) Buy, sell, issue, negotiate, register, transfer,
or countersign certificates of stock, bonds, or other obligations of any
corporation, association, or municipality;

(5) Lease, purchase, hold, and convey real and
personal property to the extent authorized by the instrument or by law, or
consistent with the purposes thereof; and

(6) Execute and issue on behalf of the estate any
documents necessary to the prudent administration thereof, including without
limitation any receipts, certificates, papers, and contracts which shall be
signed by an appropriate trust officer designated by the trust company. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 2004, c 161, §36; am L 2006, c 228, §41]

Cross References

Uniform Fiduciaries Act, see chapter 556.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next